Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-511
Practice of audiology or speech-language pathology; act, how construed.

Nothing in the Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Practice Act shall be construed to prevent or restrict:

(1) The practice of audiology or speech-language pathology or the use of the official title of such practice by a person employed as a speech-language pathologist or audiologist by the federal government;

(2) A physician from engaging in the practice of medicine and surgery or any individual from carrying out any properly delegated responsibilities within the normal practice of medicine and surgery under the supervision of a physician;

(3) A person licensed as a hearing instrument specialist in this state from engaging in the fitting, selling, ordering, and servicing of hearing instruments or performing such other duties as defined in the Hearing Instrument Specialists Practice Act;

(4) The practice of audiology or speech-language pathology or the use of the official title of such practice by a person who holds a valid and current credential as a speech-language pathologist or audiologist issued by the State Department of Education, if such person performs speech-language pathology or audiology services solely as a part of his or her duties within an agency, institution, or organization for which no fee is paid directly or indirectly by the recipient of such service and under the jurisdiction of the State Department of Education, but such person may elect to be within the jurisdiction of the Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Practice Act;

(5) The clinical practice in audiology or speech-language pathology required for students enrolled in an accredited college or university pursuing a major in audiology or speech-language pathology, if such clinical practices are supervised by a person licensed to practice audiology or speech-language pathology and if the student is designated by a title such as student clinician or other title clearly indicating the training status; or

(6) The utilization of a speech aide or other personnel employed by a public school, educational service unit, or other private or public educational institution working under the direct supervision of a licensed speech-language pathologist.

Laws 1978, LB 406, § 14;

Laws 1985, LB 129, § 15;

Laws 1990, LB 828, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 209, § 11;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,187;

Laws 2007, LB247, § 28;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 196;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 9;

Laws 2025, LB332, § 1.

Hearing Instrument Specialists Practice Act, see section 38-1501.